Massachusetts, session 194th, H3932.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Construction and development activity related to redevelopment by the
developer selected by the Boston Redevelopment Authority of subsidized affordable housing,
including space for a branch library to be procured by the Boston Public Library, to be built on
Boston Redevelopment Authority-owned land under a ground lease, or any part thereof, shall not
be subject to any general or special law related to the procurement and award of contracts for the
planning, design, construction management, construction, reconstruction, installation,
demolition, maintenance, or repair of buildings or public works by a public agency, including
chapter 149, chapter 7C, or section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, but shall be subject
to sections 26 to 27H, inclusive, of chapter 149 of the General Laws. Nor shall the acquisition of
any interest in real property by the City of Boston necessary to support the completion of the
project be subject to section 16 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, nor shall the cost of any
of 2

such acquisition be limited by any general or special law, including section 12 of chapter 642 of
the Acts of 1966. Contracts for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, remodeling, or repair
of any publicly owned public works that service this project and would otherwise be subject to
section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws shall be subject to said section 39M if the
redevelopment of the project is funded in part by state or federal government low-income
housing tax credit, grant, or loan, or pursuant to the issuance of tax-exempt bonds authorized by
general law. A conveyance of the project, whether by leasehold or fee estate, to an urban
redevelopment corporation organized under chapter 121A of the General Laws or to a nonprofit
state and federally tax-exempt corporation organized for the purpose of revitalizing the project,
shall be subject to chapter 30B of the General Laws to the extent that the project is conveyed to
an entity that is not owned, controlled, or managed by the Boston Public Library on the date of
the conveyance.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2